District of Columbia statutes.
48-831.42

Eligibility.

(a)

To be eligible, an individual shall:

(1)

Be a resident of the District;

(2)

Have a household income not exceeding 300% of the federal poverty level; and

(3)

Lack prescription coverage.

(b)

Eligibility shall be determined by the contract organization administering the program.

(c)

Eligibility for District Medicaid, DC Healthcare Alliance, and other public programs shall be screened at the time an individual seeks to enroll in the program, and appropriate referrals shall be made to the Income Maintenance Administration in the Department of Human Services.

History

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 142
as added Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 5072, 52 DCR 7503

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5072 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).